District of Columbia statutes.
7-2701

Health regulations applicable to federal government restaurants; exceptions.

(a)

The regulations now or hereafter adopted or promulgated by the Mayor of the District of Columbia or the Council of the District of Columbia for the protection of health, including the penalty provisions of such regulations, shall extend and apply to all restaurants, coffee shops, cafeterias, short-order cafes, luncheonettes, soda fountains, and all other eating and drinking establishments, operated within the District of Columbia on premises owned or held under lease by the government of the United States or any federal department or agency, irrespective of whether such establishments are operated by the United States or any federal department or agency or by any other person, firm, association, or corporation, and also irrespective of whether such establishments are operated for profit or otherwise.

(b)

This section shall not apply to the United States Senate and House of Representatives restaurants.

History

Dec. 20, 1944, 58 Stat. 826, ch. 613

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-102.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1301.
1973 Ed., § 6-1101.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Sections 401 and 402 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.